Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STUDENT MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Student mental health grants. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to organizations working to improve student mental health: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must award grants to organizations that provide elementary or secondary school students with opportunities to disconnect from electronic devices and social media, be physically active, engage in collaborative experiences, and develop in-person relationships with other students. A grant applicant must demonstrate that its program improves mental health outcomes for students. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end